Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Penitentiary-Made Goods

§ 47-5-301.
Short title.

Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327 may be cited as the “Penitentiary-Made Goods Law of 1978.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 1; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 75; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 75, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-303.
Declaration of purpose.

The aims and purposes of Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327 are:

To utilize the labor of offenders for self-maintenance and for reimbursing this state for expenses incurred by reason of their crimes and imprisonment; and

To effect the requisitioning and disbursement of penitentiary products directly through established state authorities and to permit the sale of such products to the public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 516, § 1; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 76; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 76, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-305.
Authorization to purchase materials and engage supervisory personnel; sale of products to public; contracts with private enterprise.

The State Department of Corrections is authorized to purchase, in the manner prescribed by law, equipment, raw materials and supplies, and to engage the supervisory personnel necessary to establish and maintain for this state at the penitentiary or any penal farm or institution now or hereafter under the control of such department industries for the utilization of services of offenders in the manufacture or production of such articles or products as may be needed for the construction, operation, maintenance or use of any commission, department, institution or other agency supported in whole or in part by this state and the political subdivisions thereof. The State Department of Corrections is further authorized to sell such products to the public.

The Department of Corrections is authorized to contract for work projects from outside sources, including private enterprise, for processing, fabrication or repair; however, preference shall be given to the performance of such work projects for any commission, department, institution or other agency of the state.

The Department of Corrections is further authorized to contract with private or public industrial and business enterprises regarding the location of operations or projects upon any property utilized by the state prison correctional system in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 412, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 516, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 409, § 8; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 77; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 77; Laws, 1992, ch. 506, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 47-5-307.
Purchase of penitentiary-made goods by other state agencies; state and commercial specifications.

On and after the establishment of the industries provided for in Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327, all commissions, departments, institutions and other agencies of this state, which are supported in whole or in part by this state, may purchase from the State Department of Corrections all articles or products required by such commissions, departments, institutions or agencies which are produced or manufactured by the State Department of Corrections with the use of penitentiary labor as provided for by Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327. All purchases made by state agencies shall be made through the State Fiscal Management Board upon requisition by the proper authority of the commission, department, institution or agency. Political subdivisions of this state may purchase directly from the State Department of Corrections.

Any article or product manufactured by the State Department of Corrections for sale through the State Fiscal Management Board to any commission, department, institution or agency of the state or to any political subdivision thereof, shall be manufactured and/or produced only upon state specifications developed by and through the State Fiscal Management Board. However, if such specifications have not been developed by the State Fiscal Management Board, then production may be based upon commercial specifications in current use by industry for the manufacture of such articles and products for sale to the state and political subdivisions thereof which have first been approved by the State Fiscal Management Board. For purposes of Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327, state specifications and commercial specifications approved by the State Fiscal Management Board shall mean the latest complete version of any specification including amendments thereto.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 4; Laws, 1981, ch. 516, § 5; brought forward without change, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 78; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 226; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 78, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-309.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1981, ch. 516, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

[Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 5]

§ 47-5-311.
Catalogues.

The State Department of Corrections shall cause to be prepared, at such times as it may determine, catalogues containing an accurate and complete description of all articles and products manufactured or produced by it pursuant to the provisions of Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327. Copies of such catalogues shall be sent to all commissions, departments, institutions and agencies of this state and made accessible to all political subdivisions of this state referred to in the preceding sections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 6(1); brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 79; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 79, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-313.
Summary reports of goods purchased by other state agencies.

At least thirty (30) days before the beginning of each fiscal year, the State Fiscal Management Board shall provide to the State Department of Corrections, summary reports of the kind and amount of articles and products purchased for state commissions, departments, institutions, agencies and political subdivisions based upon the previous nine (9) months’ experience. Not more than one hundred (100) days following the close of each fiscal year, the State Fiscal Management Board shall submit to the State Department of Corrections a report showing the kinds and amounts of such penitentiary-manufactured articles purchased by all state commissions, departments, institutions, agencies and political subdivisions based upon the purchase experience of the entire previous fiscal year. All such reports shall refer, insofar as possible, to the items or products contained in the catalogue as issued by the State Department of Corrections. The State Fiscal Management Board may at any time request the State Department of Corrections to manufacture or produce additional articles or products.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 6(2); brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 80; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 227; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 80, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-315.
Priority of production requirements.

The articles or products manufactured or produced by penitentiary labor in accordance with the provisions of Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327 shall be devoted first, to fulfilling the requirements of the commissions, departments, institutions and agencies of this state which are supported in whole or in part by this state; and secondly, to supplying the political subdivisions of this state with such articles and products; and lastly to producing articles and products for sale to the public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 7; Laws, 1981, ch. 516, § 6; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 81; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 81, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-317.
Determination of prices.

The Industries Division of the State Department of Corrections shall fix and determine the prices at which all articles or products manufactured or produced shall be furnished.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 387; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 82; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 82, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-319.
Annual audit reports.

In addition to the information ordinarily required by law in the annual audits of expenditures and operations of the State Department of Corrections made by the state auditor, after March 23, 1978, audit reports shall also include a detailed statement of all materials, machinery or other property procured, and the cost thereof, and the expenditures made during the audited year for manufacturing purposes, together with a statement of all materials on hand to be manufactured, or in process of manufacture, or manufactured, and the values of all machinery, fixtures or other appurtenances for the purpose of utilizing the productive labor of offenders, and the earnings realized therefrom during the year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 9; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 83; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 83, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-321.
Promulgation of policies.

The State Board of Corrections shall have the power and authority to prepare and promulgate policies which are necessary to give effect to the provisions of Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327 with respect to matters of administration respecting the same which if made shall be in writing, entered on their minutes, and available to the general public for inspection during the regular office hours of the department. Before taking effect, said policies, as well as subsequent amendments thereto, shall be placed on file by the department in the office of the secretary of state in a well-bound book designated by the secretary for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 10; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 84; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 84, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-323.
Expenditure of appropriations; deposit of collected monies in prison industries fund.

In order to carry out the provisions of Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327, the department is authorized to expend such monies out of appropriations from the Prison Industries Fund, as established by Section 47-5-66, as may be necessary to erect buildings, to improve existing facilities, to purchase equipment, to procure tools, supplies and materials, to purchase, install or replace equipment and otherwise to defray the necessary expenses incident to the employment of offenders as herein provided.

All monies collected by the State Department of Corrections from the sale or disposition of articles and products manufactured or produced by penitentiary labor in accordance with the provisions of Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327 shall be forthwith deposited into the Prison Industries Fund authorized by subsection (1) of this section. The money so collected and deposited shall be used solely for the purchase of raw materials, manufacturing supplies, equipment, machinery and buildings used to carry out the purposes of Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327, to otherwise defray the necessary expenses incident thereto, including the employment of such necessary supervisory personnel as is unavailable in the inmate population. All expenditures from such fund shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner; provided, however, that such Prison Industries Fund shall never be maintained in excess of the amount necessary to carry out efficiently and properly the intentions of Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 11; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 85; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 228; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 85; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-325.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1981, ch. 516, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

[Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 12]

§ 47-5-327.
Construction of provisions.

The provisions of Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327 shall be liberally construed to achieve the primary objective of vocational training and rehabilitation of offenders through work in industrial types of activities which also will best serve the economical and efficient operation of state agencies. The provisions of Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-327 shall be considered as supplementary, or in addition to, other existing provisions of law relative to the employment of offenders.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 408, § 13; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 86; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 86, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-329.
Prison industries advisory council; members; compensation.

The Commissioner of Corrections shall appoint a Prison Industries Advisory Council. The council shall advise the commissioner and the Governor on all aspects of the prison industry program at the State Penitentiary, including, but not limited to, the types and quantity of products to be manufactured and their manner of production.

The council shall consist of the commissioner, who shall be chairman of the council, and six (6) citizens appointed by the commissioner. The members appointed by the commissioner shall be active leaders of business and industry in this state, and one (1) of the members shall be a representative of organized labor. The members shall be familiar, insofar as possible, with the various types of prison industries in operation or contemplated for operation at the State Penitentiary. Of the initial members of the council, one (1) shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year; one (1) for a term of two (2) years; one (1) for a term of three (3) years; one (1) for a term of four (4) years; one (1) for a term of five (5) years; and one (1) for a term of six (6) years. Thereafter, each member shall serve a term of four (4) years. Vacancies shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term and members may be reappointed. Members shall receive such per diem as provided by law for each day actually spent in the performance of their duties, in addition to the actual and necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties. The per diem and expenses shall be paid from the Prison Industries Fund as created in Section 47-5-66.

The council shall meet quarterly and at such other times deemed necessary by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 516, § 2; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 87; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 87; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-331.
Lease of buildings at Parchman facility; provisions of lease.

Upon request of the Board of Corrections the Governor’s Office of General Services is authorized to lease one or more existing buildings or portions thereof on the grounds of the Parchman facility of the Department of Corrections (a) to a private individual, firm or corporation for the purpose of establishing and operating a factory for the manufacture and processing of products, or (b) to any other commercial enterprise deemed consistent with the aims and purposes of the Penitentiary-Made Goods Law. The leased premises shall include any real estate needed for reasonable access to and access from the leased buildings. The term of the lease shall not exceed twenty (20) years. Money derived from the lease of such buildings and real estate shall be placed in the Prison Industries Fund in the State Treasury.

Each lease negotiated and concluded under subsection (1) of this section shall include and shall be valid only so long as the lessee adheres to the following provisions:

All persons employed in the factory or other commercial enterprise operated in the leased property, except for lessee’s supervisory employees and necessary training personnel approved by the warden, shall be inmates of the State Penitentiary and approved for such employment by the warden and the lessee.

The factory or other commercial enterprise operated in the leased property shall observe at all times such practices and procedures regarding security as the lease may specify, or as the warden may temporarily stipulate during periods of emergency.

The factory or other commercial enterprise operated in the leased property shall be deemed a private enterprise and subject to all the laws and lawfully adopted rules of this state governing the operation of similar business enterprises elsewhere.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 516, § 4; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 88; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 229; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 88, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).